New York, session 2025-2026, S5841.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 420-a of the real 2 property tax law, as amended by chapter 919 of the laws of 1981, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Real property such as specified in paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 5 sion shall not be exempt if any officer, member or employee of the 6 owning corporation or association shall receive or may be lawfully enti- 7 tled to receive any pecuniary profit from the operations thereof, except 8 reasonable compensation for services in effecting one or more of such 9 purposes, or as proper beneficiaries of its strictly charitable 10 purposes; or if the organization thereof for any such avowed purposes be 11 a guise or pretense for directly or indirectly making any other pecuni- 12 ary profit for such corporation or association or for any of its members 13 or employees; or if it be not in good faith organized or conducted 14 exclusively for one or more of such purposes; or if such purpose in 15 which the real property is being used is in violation of applicable 16 local zoning laws. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07905-01-5